Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
PART 2 Exercise by Municipalities of Power to
Contract Generally

32-4-110.
“Contract” defined.

As used in this part, the term “contract” means a contract or subcontract entered into by a municipality with any person, the state or federal government or an agency of either, with another municipality or municipalities, with a county or counties, or with any combination of any of the foregoing entities, for the construction, reconstruction, or maintenance of all or part of a public road in said municipality, including but not limited to a contract or subcontract for the purchase of materials, for the hiring of labor, for professional services, or for other things or services incident to such work.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-831, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-4-111.
Authority of municipality to contract; form of contracts; approval of contracts by resolution.

A municipality shall have the authority to contract as set forth in this part and in Part 1 of this article. Any contract for work on all or part of the municipal road system shall be in writing and be approved by resolution which shall be entered on the minutes of such municipality.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-832, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 32.

32-4-112.
Contracts with state agencies and adjoining counties.

A contract with a state agency is subject to those limitations of subparagraph (d)(1)(A) and paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of Code Section 32-2-61.

A municipality may contract with any county in which part of the municipality lies for the construction and maintenance of a public road within the limits of such municipality. A municipality may contract with any county abutting the corporate limits of such municipality for the construction and maintenance of a bridge within the limits of both such municipality and such county.

In such contract, the county may agree to use any county funds available for the construction and maintenance of roads in such county, including funds derived from general obligation bonds issued after approval in a county-wide election, to pay the costs, in whole or in part, of the construction or maintenance of such public road.

In such contract, the municipality may agree to use any funds available for the construction and maintenance of roads in such municipality, together with any funds the municipality may collect pursuant to its power to assess any part of its share of the cost of such contract against abutting and adjoining property and the owners thereof according to the provisions of Chapter 39 of Title 36, as if the municipality were performing the work alone, unless the terms of such assessment shall be in violation of the municipality’s charter, an ordinance of the municipality, or a general law of the state.

The work under such contract may be performed either by county or municipal forces or by a contractor employed by either or jointly.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-833, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2018, p. 714, § 1/SB 324.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added the second sentence in paragraph (b)(1).

32-4-113.
Limitations on power to contract; at least two estimates required for certain expenditures.

A municipality is prohibited from negotiating a contract except a contract:

Involving the expenditure of less than $200,000.00;

With a state agency or political subdivision as authorized by Code Sections 32-4-111 and 32-4-112;

With a railroad or railway company or a publicly or privately owned utility as authorized by Article 6 of Chapter 6 of this title;

For engineering or other kinds of professional or specialized services;

For emergency maintenance requiring immediate repairs to a public road, including but not limited to bridge repairs, snow and ice removal, and repairs due to flood conditions; or

Otherwise expressly authorized by law.

No contract involving an expenditure of more than $20,000.00 but less than $200,000.00 shall be awarded under this Code section without the submission of at least two estimates.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-834, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 356, § 3; Ga. L. 2014, p. 851, § 4/HB 774.

32-4-114.
Required letting of contracts by public bid.

Except as authorized by Code Section 32-4-113, all contracts shall be let by public bid.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-835, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-4-115.
Advertising for bids.

Notwithstanding any provision of Code Section 36-39-10 to the contrary, on all contracts to be let by public bid a municipality shall advertise for competitive sealed bids for at least two weeks. The public advertisement shall be inserted once a week in such newspapers wherein the county sheriff’s sales are advertised or in such newspapers or other publications, or both, as will ensure adequate publicity, the first insertion to be at least two weeks prior to the opening of the sealed bids, the second to follow one week after the publication of the first insertion.

Such advertisement shall include but not be limited to the following:

A description sufficient to enable the public to know the approximate extent and character of the work to be done;

The time allowed for performance;

The terms and time of payment;

Where and under what conditions and costs the detailed plans and specifications and proposal forms may be obtained;

The amount of the proposal guaranty, if one is required;

The time and place for submission and opening of bids;

The right of the municipality to reject any one or all bids; and

Such further notice as the municipality may deem advisable as in the public interest.

History.

Ga. L. 1922, p. 37, § 1a; Code 1933, § 95-1103; Code 1933, § 95A-836, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-4-116.
Payment by bidder to cover costs.

A municipality may require each bidder to pay a reasonable sum sufficient to cover the cost to the municipality, where applicable, of the bid proposal form, the contract, and its specifications.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-837, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-4-117.
Proposal guaranty by bidder.

A municipality may require that each bid on a particular contract, as a prerequisite to the bid being considered, be accompanied by a proposal guaranty in the form of a certified check or other acceptable security payable to the municipality for an amount deemed by the municipality in the public interest necessary to ensure that the successful bidder will execute the contract on which he bid.

Such proposal guaranty will be returned to a bidder upon receipt by the municipality of the bidder’s written withdrawal of his bid if such receipt is before the time scheduled for the opening of bids. Upon the determination by the municipality of the lowest reliable bidder, the municipality will return proposal guaranties to all bidders except the proposal guaranty of the lowest reliable bidder. If no contract award is made within 30 days after the date set for the opening of bids, all bids shall be rejected and all proposal guaranties shall be returned unless the municipality and the successful bidder agree in writing to a longer period of time.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-838, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-4-118.
Award of contract to lowest reliable bidder; procedure upon rejection of bids.

Notwithstanding any provisions of Code Section 36-39-11 to the contrary, where a contract has been let for bid, the municipality, by resolution entered in its minutes, shall award the contract to the lowest reliable bidder, provided that the municipality shall have the right to reject any and all such bids whether such right is reserved in the public notice or not and, in such case, may readvertise, perform the work itself, or abandon the project.

History.

Ga. L. 1922, p. 37, § 1c; Code 1933, § 95-1005; Code 1933, § 95A-839, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-4-119.
Bonds of successful bidder.

Notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 91 of Title 36 to the contrary, where the contract price is $5,000.00 or more, no construction contract of a municipality, other than a contract solely for engineering or other professional services, shall be valid unless the contractor first gives:

A performance and payment bond which meets the requirements of Parts 1, 3, and 4 of Article 3 of Chapter 91 of Title 36; and

Such other bonds or insurance policies required by the municipality in its proposal forms, including but not limited to public liability and property damage insurance bonds or policies and bonds to maintain in good condition such completed construction for a period of not less than five years.

History.

Ga. L. 1922, p. 37, § 1b; Code 1933, § 95-1104; Code 1933, § 95A-840, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 8; Ga. L. 2007, p. 167, § 5/HB 192.

32-4-120.
Failure to take bonds; liability of municipality.

If the payment bond required by Code Section 32-4-119 is not taken, the municipality then shall be liable to subcontractors, laborers, materialmen, and other persons, as provided in Part 4 of Article 3 of Chapter 91 of Title 36, for losses to them resulting from failure to take such bond.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-841, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 498, § 15; Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 9.

32-4-121.
Failure of successful bidder to sign contract or furnish bonds.

If the successful bidder fails to sign the contract or furnish the bonds required under authority of Code Section 32-4-119, his proposal guaranty, if one had been required by the municipality, will become the property of the municipality as liquidated damages. The contract then may be readvertised, or the project may be abandoned.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-842, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-4-122.
Oath by successful bidder.

A successful bidder, before commencing the work, shall execute a written oath, as required by subsection (e) of Code Section 36-91-22, stating that he has not violated such Code section which makes it unlawful to restrict competitive bidding.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-843, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 32.

32-4-123.
Other laws applicable to part.

Except as indicated to the contrary in this part, Chapter 91 of Title 36 shall not apply to this part.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-844, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 498, § 16; Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 10.